Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.027

Application of chapter to passenger-only ferry employees.

In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter does apply to:

(1) Public employees of public transportation benefit areas providing passenger-only ferry service as provided in RCW 47.64.090; and

(2) Public employees of ferry districts providing passenger-only ferry service as provided in RCW 47.64.090.

[ 2003 c 91 s 2.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2003 c 91: See note following RCW 47.64.090.